Utah statutes.
7-1-205.   Supervisor of banks -- Responsibilities.

(1)  The commissioner shall designate an examiner as supervisor of banks, who shall be sufficiently qualified by training and experience in the banking business or as an employee of a state or federal bank supervisory agency to perform the duties of the office.

(2)  The supervisor of banks is responsible, subject to the direction and control of the commissioner, for the general supervision and examination of all banks and bank-related institutions subject to the jurisdiction of the department.  The supervisor shall assist and advise the commissioner in the execution of the laws of this state relating to these institutions and shall perform other duties prescribed in this title or assigned by the commissioner.



Amended by Chapter 200, 1994 General Session

